Florida, session 2026, SB7044.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 47 48 Section 1.âSubsection (8) is added to section 560.129, 49 Florida Statutes, and subsections (1), (2), and (4) of that 50 section are reenacted, to read: 51 560.129âConfidentiality.â 52 (1)âExcept as otherwise provided in this section, all 53 information concerning an investigation or examination conducted 54 by the office pursuant to this chapter, including any customer 55 complaint received by the office or the Department of Financial 56 Services, is confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 57 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution until the investigation 58 or examination ceases to be active. For purposes of this 59 section, an investigation or examination is considered âactiveâ 60 so long as the office or any other administrative, regulatory, 61 or law enforcement agency of any jurisdiction is proceeding with 62 reasonable dispatch and has a reasonable good faith belief that 63 action may be initiated by the office or other administrative, 64 regulatory, or law enforcement agency. 65 (2)âAll information obtained by the office in the course of 66 its investigation or examination which is a trade secret, as 67 defined in s. 688.002, or which is personal financial 68 information shall remain confidential and exempt from s. 69 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. If any 70 administrative, civil, or criminal proceeding against a money 71 services business, its authorized vendor, or an affiliated party 72 is initiated and the office seeks to use matter that a licensee 73 believes to be a trade secret or personal financial information, 74 such records shall be subject to an in camera review by the 75 administrative law judge, if the matter is before the Division 76 of Administrative Hearings, or a judge of any court of this 77 state, any other state, or the United States, as appropriate, 78 for the purpose of determining if the matter is a trade secret 79 or is personal financial information. If it is determined that 80 the matter is a trade secret, the matter shall remain 81 confidential. If it is determined that the matter is personal 82 financial information, the matter shall remain confidential 83 unless the administrative law judge or judge determines that, in 84 the interests of justice, the matter should become public. 85 (4)âExcept as necessary for the office or any other 86 administrative, regulatory, or law enforcement agency of any 87 jurisdiction to enforce the provisions of this chapter or the 88 law of any other state or the United States, a consumer 89 complaint and other information concerning an investigation or 90 examination shall remain confidential and exempt from s. 91 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution after 92 the investigation or examination ceases to be active to the 93 extent that disclosure would: 94 (a)âJeopardize the integrity of another active 95 investigation; 96 (b)âReveal personal financial information; 97 (c)âReveal the identity of a confidential source; or 98 (d)âReveal investigative techniques or procedures. 99 (8)âSubsections (1), (2), and (4) are subject to the Open 100 Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and 101 shall stand repealed on October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and 102 saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 103 Section 2.âSubsection (4) is added to section 560.312, 104 Florida Statutes, and subsection (1) of that section is 105 reenacted, to read: 106 560.312âDatabase of payment instrument transactions; 107 confidentiality.â 108 (1)âPayment instrument transaction information held by the 109 office pursuant to s. 560.310 which identifies a licensee, 110 payor, payee, or conductor is confidential and exempt from s. 111 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 112 (4)âSubsection (1) is subject to the Open Government Sunset 113 Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed 114 on October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and saved from repeal 115 through reenactment by the Legislature. 116 Section 3.âSection 560.4041, Florida Statutes, is amended 117 to read: 118 560.4041âDatabase for deferred presentment providers; 119 public records exemption.â 120 (1)âInformation that identifies a drawer or a deferred 121 presentment provider contained in the database authorized under 122 s. 560.404 is confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 123 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. A deferred presentment 124 provider may access information that it has entered into the 125 database and may obtain an eligibility determination for a 126 particular drawer based on information in the database. 127 (2)âSubsection (1) is subject to the Open Government Sunset 128 Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed 129 on October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and saved from repeal 130 through reenactment by the Legislature. 131 Section 4.â(1)âThe Legislature finds all of the following: 132 (a)âThat it is a public necessity that all information 133 concerning an investigation or examination of a money services 134 business conducted by the Office of Financial Regulation 135 pursuant to chapter 560, Florida Statutes, including a consumer 136 complaint, be made confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1), 137 Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the State 138 Constitution until the investigation or examination ceases to be 139 active. The Legislature further finds that such information 140 should remain confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida 141 Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the State Constitution 142 after the investigation or examination ceases to be active if 143 its disclosure would jeopardize the officeâs investigations by 144 revealing techniques or procedures or otherwise reveal 145 information that is being used in another investigation, or if 146 disclosure would reveal personal financial information or a 147 confidential source. 148 (b)âThat it is a public necessity that trade secrets or 149 personal financial information obtained by the office in the 150 course of an investigation or examination pursuant to chapter 151 560, Florida Statutes, be made confidential and exempt from s. 152 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the 153 State Constitution, unless an administrative law judge or 154 circuit judge determines that the release of personal financial 155 information to the public is in the interest of justice. 156 (c)âThat it is a public necessity that payment instrument 157 transaction information held by the office pursuant to s. 158 560.310, Florida Statutes, which identifies a licensee, payor, 159 payee, or conductor be made confidential and exempt from s. 160 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the 161 State Constitution. 162 (d)âThat it is a public necessity that deferred presentment 163 transaction information held by the office pursuant to s. 164 560.404, Florida Statutes, which identifies a drawer or a 165 deferred presentment provider be made confidential and exempt 166 from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of 167 the State Constitution. 168 (2)âInformation specified in paragraphs (1)(a) and (b) is 169 held by the office in conjunction with its investigations and 170 examinations of money services businesses, which include money 171 transmitters, as defined in s. 560.103, Florida Statutes, as 172 amended by chapter 2025-100, Laws of Florida, to include 173 custodians of gold coin or silver coin. Custodians of gold coin 174 or silver coin are thus subject to investigation or examination 175 by the office. As a result, the office may receive sensitive 176 personal and financial information relating to such entities in 177 conjunction with its duties under chapter 560, Florida Statutes. 178 An exemption from public records requirements provides the same 179 protections to custodians of gold coin or silver coin as are 180 afforded to other money services businesses, thereby preventing 181 any disadvantage to these similarly regulated entities in 182 comparison to other entities currently classified as money 183 services businesses. An exemption from public records 184 requirements for reports of examinations, operations, or 185 condition, including working papers, is necessary to ensure the 186 officeâs ability to effectively and efficiently administer its 187 examination and investigation duties. Examination and 188 investigation are essential components of financial institutions 189 regulation. They deter fraud and ensure the safety and soundness 190 of the financial system. Examinations also provide a means of 191 early detection of violations, allowing for corrective action to 192 be taken before any harm can be done. Release of such 193 information could compromise the officeâs investigations and 194 examinations, reveal investigative techniques, or result in the 195 disclosure of an individualâs personal financial information. 196 Such disclosure could also result in the release of inaccurate 197 information, which could harm the subject of the examination or 198 investigation, or otherwise impair commerce relating to money 199 services businesses. The Legislature finds that there is little 200 public benefit derived from access to such information during 201 the officeâs investigation or examination, and that the 202 exemption is narrowly tailored to allow for release except where 203 the public benefit is outweighed by harm to either the officeâs 204 investigations or to individuals whose personal financial 205 information may be disclosed. 206 (3)âInformation specified in paragraphs (1)(c) and (d) held 207 by the office in its database of payment instrument transactions 208 pursuant to s. 560.312, Florida Statutes, and deferred 209 presentment transactions pursuant to s. 560.404, Florida 210 Statutes, may include information that identifies money 211 transmitters, as defined in s. 560.103, Florida Statutes, as 212 amended by chapter 2025-100, Laws of Florida, to include 213 custodians of gold coin or silver coin. As a result, the office 214 may receive sensitive personal and financial information 215 relating to custodians of gold coin or silver coin that cash a 216 payment instrument exceeding $1,000 or deferred presentment 217 transactions for a particular person. An exemption from public 218 records requirements for custodians of gold coin and silver coin 219 provides the same protections to custodians of gold coin or 220 silver coin as are afforded to other money services businesses, 221 thereby preventing any disadvantage to these similarly regulated 222 entities in comparison to other entities currently classified as 223 money services businesses. An exemption from public records 224 requirements for payment instrument transactions is necessary to 225 deter money laundering and identity theft and related crimes 226 through such custodians. The availability of this information to 227 the office will help increase premium collection, lower costs to 228 insurance carriers, and alleviate premium avoidance, as well as 229 reduce the cost of administering these public programs. However, 230 the public availability of payment instrument transaction or 231 deferred presentment transaction information would reveal 232 sensitive, personal financial information about payees and 233 conductors who use check-cashing and deferred presentment 234 programs, including paycheck amounts, salaries, and business 235 activities, as well as information regarding the financial 236 stability of these custodians. Such information is traditionally 237 private and sensitive. Protecting the confidentiality of such 238 information that would identify these payees and custodians 239 would provide adequate protection for these persons while still 240 providing public oversight of the check-cashing and deferred 241 presentment programs. The public release of payment instrument 242 transaction and deferred presentment transaction information 243 would also identify licensees or payors and reveal business 244 transaction information that is traditionally private and could 245 be used by competitors to harm other licensees or payors in the 246 marketplace. If such information were publicly available, 247 competitors could determine the amount of business conducted by 248 other licensees or payors. 249 Section 5.âSubsection (15) is added to section 655.057, 250 Florida Statutes, and subsections (1) through (4), (6), and (10) 251 of that section are reenacted, to read: 252 655.057âRecords; limited restrictions upon public access.â 253 (1)âExcept as otherwise provided in this section and except 254 for such portions thereof which are otherwise public record, all 255 records and information relating to an investigation by the 256 office are confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 257 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution until such investigation 258 is completed or ceases to be active. For purposes of this 259 subsection, an investigation is considered âactiveâ while such 260 investigation is being conducted by the office with a 261 reasonable, good faith belief that it may lead to the filing of 262 administrative, civil, or criminal proceedings. An investigation 263 does not cease to be active if the office is proceeding with 264 reasonable dispatch, and there is a good faith belief that 265 action may be initiated by the office or other administrative or 266 law enforcement agency. After an investigation is completed or 267 ceases to be active, portions of the records relating to the 268 investigation are confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and 269 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution to the extent that 270 disclosure would: 271 (a)âJeopardize the integrity of another active 272 investigation; 273 (b)âImpair the safety and soundness of the financial 274 institution; 275 (c)âReveal personal financial information; 276 (d)âReveal the identity of a confidential source; 277 (e)âDefame or cause unwarranted damage to the good name or 278 reputation of an individual or jeopardize the safety of an 279 individual; or 280 (f)âReveal investigative techniques or procedures. 281 (2)âExcept as otherwise provided in this section and except 282 for such portions thereof which are public record, reports of 283 examinations, operations, or condition, including working 284 papers, or portions thereof, prepared by, or for the use of, the 285 office or any state or federal agency responsible for the 286 regulation or supervision of financial institutions in this 287 state are confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 288 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. However, such reports 289 or papers or portions thereof may be released to: 290 (a)âThe financial institution under examination; 291 (b)âAny holding company of which the financial institution 292 is a subsidiary; 293 (c)âProposed purchasers if necessary to protect the 294 continued financial viability of the financial institution, upon 295 prior approval by the board of directors of such institution; 296 (d)âPersons proposing in good faith to acquire a 297 controlling interest in or to merge with the financial 298 institution, upon prior approval by the board of directors of 299 such financial institution; 300 (e)âAny officer, director, committee member, employee, 301 attorney, auditor, or independent auditor officially connected 302 with the financial institution, holding company, proposed 303 purchaser, or person seeking to acquire a controlling interest 304 in or merge with the financial institution; or 305 (f)âA fidelity insurance company, upon approval of the 306 financial institutionâs board of directors. However, a fidelity 307 insurance company may receive only that portion of an 308 examination report relating to a claim or investigation being 309 conducted by such fidelity insurance company. 310 (g)âExamination, operation, or condition reports of a 311 financial institution shall be released by the office within 1 312 year after the appointment of a liquidator, receiver, or 313 conservator to the financial institution. However, any portion 314 of such reports which discloses the identities of depositors, 315 bondholders, members, borrowers, or stockholders, other than 316 directors, officers, or controlling stockholders of the 317 institution, shall remain confidential and exempt from s. 318 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 319 320 Any confidential information or records obtained from the office 321 pursuant to this subsection shall be maintained as confidential 322 and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 323 Constitution. 324 (3)âExcept as otherwise provided in this section and except 325 for those portions that are otherwise public record, after an 326 investigation relating to an informal enforcement action is 327 completed or ceases to be active, informal enforcement actions 328 are confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. 329 I of the State Constitution to the extent that disclosure would: 330 (a)âJeopardize the integrity of another active 331 investigation. 332 (b)âImpair the safety and soundness of the financial 333 institution. 334 (c)âReveal personal financial information. 335 (d)âReveal the identity of a confidential source. 336 (e)âDefame or cause unwarranted damage to the good name or 337 reputation of an individual or jeopardize the safety of an 338 individual. 339 (f)âReveal investigative techniques or procedures. 340 (4)âExcept as otherwise provided in this section and except 341 for those portions that are otherwise public record, trade 342 secrets as defined in s. 688.002 which comply with s. 655.0591 343 and which are held by the office in accordance with its 344 statutory duties with respect to the financial institutions 345 codes are confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 346 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 347 (6)âThis section does not prevent or restrict: 348 (a)âPublishing reports that are required to be submitted to 349 the office pursuant to s. 655.045(2) or required by applicable 350 federal statutes or regulations to be published. 351 (b)âFurnishing records or information to any other state, 352 federal, or foreign agency responsible for the regulation or 353 supervision of financial institutions. 354 (c)âDisclosing or publishing summaries of the condition of 355 financial institutions and general economic and similar 356 statistics and data, provided that the identity of a particular 357 financial institution is not disclosed. 358 (d)âReporting any suspected criminal activity, with 359 supporting documents and information, to appropriate law 360 enforcement and prosecutorial agencies. 361 (e)âFurnishing information upon request to the Chief 362 Financial Officer or the Division of Treasury of the Department 363 of Financial Services regarding the financial condition of any 364 financial institution that is, or has applied to be, designated 365 as a qualified public depository pursuant to chapter 280. 366 (f)âFurnishing information to Federal Home Loan Banks 367 regarding its member institutions pursuant to an information 368 sharing agreement between the Federal Home Loan Banks and the 369 office. 370 371 Any confidential information or records obtained from the office 372 pursuant to this subsection shall be maintained as confidential 373 and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 374 Constitution. 375 (10)âMaterials supplied to the office or to employees of 376 any financial institution by other state or federal governmental 377 agencies remain the property of the submitting agency or the 378 corporation, and any document request must be made to the 379 appropriate agency. Any confidential documents supplied to the 380 office or to employees of any financial institution by other 381 state or federal governmental agencies are confidential and 382 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 383 Constitution. Such information shall be made public only with 384 the consent of such agency or the corporation. 385 (15)âSubsections (1)-(4), (6), and (10) are subject to the 386 Open Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 387 and are repealed October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and saved from 388 repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 389 Section 6.â(1)âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 390 necessity that all records and information relating to an 391 investigation by the Office of Financial Regulation undertaken 392 pursuant to chapter 655, Florida Statutes, be made confidential 393 and exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), 394 Article I of the State Constitution until the investigation 395 ceases to be active. The Legislature further finds that such 396 information should remain confidential and exempt from s. 397 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the 398 State Constitution after the investigation ceases to be active 399 if its disclosure would jeopardize the officeâs investigations 400 by revealing techniques or procedures, or otherwise reveal 401 information that is being used in another investigation; reveal 402 personal financial information or a confidential source; or 403 defame or cause unwarranted damage to an individualâs reputation 404 or jeopardize his or her safety. 405 (2)âInformation specified in s. 655.057(1)-(4), (6), and 406 (10) is held by the office in conjunction with investigations of 407 financial institutions which may include records concerning gold 408 coin or silver coin products or services offered by such 409 institutions, as authorized in s. 215.986(2)(e), Florida 410 Statutes, enacted in chapter 2025-100, Laws of Florida. As a 411 result, the office may receive sensitive personal and financial 412 information relating to such institutions in conjunction with 413 its duties under chapter 655, Florida Statutes. An exemption 414 from public records requirements provides the same protections 415 to custodians of gold coin or silver coin as are afforded to 416 other financial institutions, thereby preventing any 417 disadvantage to these similarly regulated entities in comparison 418 to other entities currently classified as financial 419 institutions. An exemption from public records requirements for 420 reports of examinations, operations, or condition, including 421 working papers, is necessary to ensure the officeâs ability to 422 effectively and efficiently administer its examination and 423 investigation duties. Examination and investigation are 424 essential components of financial institutions regulation. They 425 deter fraud and ensure the safety and soundness of the financial 426 system. Examinations also provide a means of early detection of 427 violations, allowing for corrective action to be taken before 428 any harm can be done. 429 (3)âThe Legislature finds that it is a public necessity to 430 make confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida 431 Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the State Constitution 432 records and information relating to an investigation by the 433 Office of Financial Regulation; portions of records relating to 434 a completed or inactive investigation by the office which would 435 jeopardize the integrity of another active investigation, impair 436 the safety and soundness of the financial institution, reveal 437 personal financial information, reveal the identity of a 438 confidential source, defame or cause unwarranted damage to the 439 good name or reputation of an individual or jeopardize the 440 safety of an individual, or reveal investigative techniques or 441 procedures; reports of examinations, operations, or condition, 442 including working papers, or portions thereof, prepared by, or 443 for the use of, the office or any state or federal agency 444 responsible for the regulation or supervision of financial 445 institutions in this state, until 1 year after the appointment 446 of a liquidator; any portion of such reports which discloses the 447 identities of depositors, bondholders, members, borrowers, or 448 stockholders, other than directors, officers, or controlling 449 stockholders of the institution; trade secrets held by the 450 office in accordance with its statutory duties under chapter 451 655, Florida Statutes, unless an administrative law judge or 452 circuit judge determines that the release of personal financial 453 information to the public is in the interest of justice; and 454 materials supplied to the office or to employees of any 455 financial institution by other state or federal governmental 456 agencies. 457 (4)âRelease of information specified in s. 655.057(1)-(4), 458 (6), and (10) could compromise the officeâs investigations and 459 examinations, reveal investigative techniques, result in the 460 disclosure of an individualâs personal financial information, or 461 defame or cause unwarranted damage to the good name or 462 reputation of an individual or entity or jeopardize his or her 463 safety. Such disclosure could also result in the spread of 464 inaccurate information, which could harm the subject of the 465 examination or investigation, or otherwise impair commerce 466 conducted by financial institutions in this state. Any portion 467 of a record or information relating to an investigation or 468 examination which reveals personal financial information or the 469 identity of a confidential source may defame, or cause 470 unwarranted damage to the good name or reputation of, those 471 individuals, or jeopardize their safety. 472 (5)âA trade secret derives independent economic value, 473 actual or potential, from not being generally known to, and not 474 readily ascertainable by, other persons who can obtain economic 475 value from the disclosure or use of the trade secret. Without an 476 exemption for a trade secret held by the office in accordance 477 with its duties prescribed by chapter 655, Florida Statutes, 478 that trade secret becomes a public record when received and must 479 be divulged upon request. Divulging a trade secret under the 480 public records law would give business competitors an unfair 481 advantage and destroy the value of that property, causing a 482 financial loss to the person or entity submitting the trade 483 secret and weakening the position of that person or entity in 484 the marketplace. 485 (6)âThe Legislature finds that there is little public 486 benefit derived from access to such information during the 487 officeâs investigation, and that the exemption is narrowly 488 tailored to allow for release except when the public benefit is 489 outweighed by harm to individuals or institutions, when the 490 disclosure would jeopardize other investigations, reveal the 491 officeâs investigative techniques or procedures, or expose 492 personal financial information or a confidential source. 493 Section 7.âSubsection (7) of section 655.50, Florida 494 Statutes, is amended, and paragraph (d) of subsection (5) of 495 this section is reenacted, to read: 496 655.50âFlorida Control of Money Laundering and Terrorist 497 Financing in Financial Institutions Act.â 498 (5)âA financial institution shall keep a record of each 499 financial transaction occurring in this state known to it which 500 involves currency or other monetary instrument, as the 501 commission prescribes by rule, has a value greater than $10,000, 502 and involves the proceeds of specified unlawful activity, or is 503 designed to evade the reporting requirements of this section, 504 chapter 896, or similar state or federal law, or which the 505 financial institution reasonably believes is suspicious 506 activity. Each financial institution shall maintain appropriate 507 procedures to ensure compliance with this section, chapter 896, 508 and other similar state or federal law. Any report of suspicious 509 activity made pursuant to this subsection is entitled to the 510 same confidentiality provided under 31 C.F.R. s. 1020.320, 511 whether the report or information pertaining to or identifying 512 the report is in the possession or control of the office or the 513 reporting institution. 514 (d)âEach financial institution shall file a report of the 515 records required under this subsection with the office. Each 516 report shall be filed at such time and must contain such 517 information as the commission requires by rule. 518 (7)âAll reports and records filed with the office pursuant 519 to this section are confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) 520 and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. However, the 521 office shall provide any report filed pursuant to this section, 522 or information contained therein, to federal, state, and local 523 law enforcement and prosecutorial agencies, and any federal or 524 state agency responsible for the regulation or supervision of 525 financial institutions. 526 Section 8.â(1)âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 527 necessity that all reports and records filed with the Office of 528 Financial Regulation be made confidential and exempt from s. 529 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the 530 State Constitution unless disclosure is requested by a federal, 531 state, or local law enforcement or prosecutorial agency or any 532 federal or state agency responsible for the regulation or 533 supervision of financial institutions. Information regarding 534 potential money laundering or terrorism must be safeguarded to 535 prevent the potential offender from being tipped off or 536 circumventing an investigation conducted by the office, and 537 disclosure of such information could harm the officeâs 538 investigations. 539 (2)âThese reports and records are held by the office in 540 conjunction with its duties pursuant to 31 U.S.C. s. 5313 and 31 541 C.F.R. part 1020 and its investigations of financial 542 institutionsâ transactions involving monetary instruments 543 concerning gold coin or silver coin products or services offered 544 by such institutions, as authorized in s. 215.986(2)(e), Florida 545 Statutes, enacted in chapter 2025-100, Laws of Florida, to 546 include any transactions involving gold coin or silver coin 547 products or services offered by such financial institutions. As 548 a result, the office may receive sensitive personal and 549 financial information relating to such entities in conjunction 550 with its duties under chapter 655, Florida Statutes. An 551 exemption from public records requirements provides the same 552 protections to custodians of gold coin or silver coin as are 553 afforded to other financial institutions, thereby preventing any 554 disadvantage to these similarly regulated entities in comparison 555 to other entities currently classified as financial 556 institutions. An exemption from public records requirements for 557 reports and records submitted to the office is necessary to 558 ensure the officeâs ability to effectively and efficiently 559 administer its investigation duties. Examination and 560 investigation are essential components of financial institutions 561 regulation. They deter fraud and ensure the safety and soundness 562 of the financial system. Examinations also provide a means of 563 early detection of violations, allowing for corrective action to 564 be taken before any harm can be done. 565 Section 9.âThis act shall take effect on the same date that 566 sections 1 through 15 of chapter 2025-100, Laws of Florida, 567 become effective.